Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 14. Foreign Corporations.

§ 13.1-919.
Authority to transact business required.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Commission.

The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection A:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of the board of directors or members or carrying on other activities concerning internal corporate affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside the Commonwealth before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, deeds of trust, and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing deeds of trust and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within 30 days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;

For a period of less than 90 consecutive days, producing, directing, filming, crewing or acting in motion picture feature films, television series or commercials, or promotional films which are sent outside of the Commonwealth for processing, editing, marketing and distribution; or

Serving, without more, as a general partner of or as a partner in a partnership that is a general partner of a domestic or foreign limited partnership that does not otherwise transact business in the Commonwealth.

The list of activities in subsection B is not exhaustive.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-265 to 13.1-265.2; 1956, c. 428; 1962, c. 239; 1980, c. 630; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

Cross references.

As to effect of certificate of domestication, see §§

13.1-898.4

and

13.1-898.6

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection A and in subdivision B 5; deleted “of this section” at the end of the introductory paragraph in subsection B and following “subsection B” in subsection C; added subdivision B 11; and made minor stylistic and related changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Foreign business trust need not obtain certificate of authority before filing fictitious name certificate. —

A foreign business trust is not required to obtain a certificate of authority before filing a fictitious name certificate as a foreign business trust is not included within definitions of business entities required to obtain either a certificate of authority or certificate of registration. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John T. Frey, Clerk, Circuit Court of Fairfax County, 00-039, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (6/12/00).

§ 13.1-920.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority may not maintain a proceeding in any court in the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of authority.

Notwithstanding subsections A and C, the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its corporate acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in the Commonwealth.

The successor to a foreign corporation that transacted business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding based on that cause of action in any court in the Commonwealth until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains a certificate of authority.A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation, its successor, or assignee until it determines whether the foreign corporation or its successor requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court shall further stay the proceeding until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains the certificate.

If a foreign corporation transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority, each officer, director, and employee who does any of such business in the Commonwealth knowing that a certificate of authority is required shall be liable for a penalty of not less than $500 and not more than $5,000. Any such penalty may be imposed by the Commission or by any court in the Commonwealth before which an action against the corporation may lie, after the corporation and the individual have been given notice and an opportunity to be heard.

Suits, actions and proceedings may be begun against a foreign corporation that transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority by serving process on any director, officer or agent of the corporation doing such business, or, if none can be found, on the clerk of the Commission or on the corporation in any other manner permitted by law. If any foreign corporation transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of authority, it shall by transacting such business be deemed to have thereby appointed the clerk of the Commission its attorney for service of process. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-218, 13.1-281; 1956, c. 428; 1981, c. 320; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 571; 1990, c. 325; 1991, c. 672; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; substituted “in the Commonwealth” for “of this Commonwealth” in subsection A; in subsection B, deleted “of this section” following “subsections A and C” and substituted “does” for “shall” following “authority”; redesignated former subsection D as the present last paragraph in subsection C; redesignated former subsections E and F as present subsections D and E; in subsection D, substituted “and employee who does” for “or, employee who transacts” in the first sentence and in the last sentence, deleted “notice and opportunity to be heard both to” preceding “the corporation,” deleted “to” preceding “the individual” and added the language beginning “have been given notice” at the end; and in subsection E, in the first sentence, inserted “doing such business” following the second occurrence of “corporation” and added the language beginning “or on the corporation” at the end and substituted “Service upon the clerk shall be made” for “Service shall be made on the clerk” at the beginning of the last sentence.

§ 13.1-921.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply to the Commission for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth. The application shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the Commission. The application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation, and if the corporation is prevented by §

13.1-924

from using its name in the Commonwealth, a designated name that satisfies the requirements of subsection B of §

13.1-924

;

The foreign corporation’s jurisdiction of formation, and if the foreign corporation was previously authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, with respect to every such prior authorization or registration, (i) the name of the entity; (ii) the entity type; (iii) the state or other jurisdiction of incorporation, organization, or formation; and (iv) the entity identification number issued to it by the Commission;

The foreign corporation’s original date of incorporation, organization, or formation as an entity and its period of duration;

The street address of the foreign corporation’s principal office;

The address of the proposed registered office of the foreign corporation in the Commonwealth, including both (i) the post office address with street and number, if any, and (ii) the name of the county or city in which it is located, and the name of its proposed registered agent in the Commonwealth at such address and that the registered agent is either (a) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and either an officer or director of the corporation or a member of the Virginia State Bar or (b) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office; and

The names and usual business addresses of the current directors and principal officers of the foreign corporation.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a copy of its articles of incorporation and all amendments and corrections thereto, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in its jurisdiction of formation.

A foreign corporation is not precluded from receiving a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth because of any difference between the law of the foreign corporation’s jurisdiction of formation and the law of the Commonwealth.

If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-269, 13.1-270; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1994, c. 348; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2002, c. 607; 2004, c. 274; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to surrender of articles of incorporation upon domestication, see §

13.1-898.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in subdivision A 5, substituted “either (a) an individual who is a resident” for “(a) resident,” inserted “either” following “resident of Virginia and” and substituted “a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “a professional corporation or professional, limited liability company registered pursuant to §

54.1-3902

.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 607, in subdivision A 1, substituted “and” for “or” following “corporation,” and “§

13.1-924

” for “§

13.1-829

.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” and added the language beginning “and if the corporation was previously authorized” at the end of subdivision A 2; substituted “post office” for “post-office” in clause (i) of subdivision A 5; substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” in subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925, in subdivision A 3, deleted “the” preceding “period” and “of the corporation”
at the end; deleted the parenthesis markings in subdivision A 5; in subsection B, deleted “to the Commission” following “shall deliver” and substituted “Secretary of State or other official” for “proper official”; substituted “the” for “such” preceding “application” in subsection C; and made punctuation and related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 deleted “own” preceding “name in the Commonwealth” in subdivision A 1 and inserted “principal” in A 6.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “foreign” in subdivision A 1; in subdivision A 2, substituted “foreign corporation’s” for “name of the state or other” and “of formation” for “under whose laws it is incorporated” and inserted the first occurrence of “foreign”; in subdivision A 3, inserted “foreign corporation’s original,” “organization, or formation as an entity,” and “its”; in subsection B, inserted “and corrections” and substituted “its jurisdiction of formation” for “the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is incorporated”; and added subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-922.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Commission:

If it changes its corporate name or the state or other jurisdiction of its incorporation; or

To abandon or change the designated name adopted by the corporation for use in the Commonwealth pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-924

.

The requirements of §

13.1-921

for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

Whenever the articles of incorporation of a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth are amended, within 30 days after the amendment becomes effective, the foreign corporation shall file with the Commission a copy of such amendment duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-275 to 13.1-277; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 571; 1987, c. 431; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection A; and in subsection C, inserted “that is” preceding “authorized,” substituted “Virginia” for “this Commonwealth,” “Secretary of State or other official” for “proper official” and “law” for “laws” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” throughout the section; added the subdivision designations in subsection A; added subdivision A 2; and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “Virginia” in subsection C.

§ 13.1-923.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in the Commonwealth, subject, however, to the right of the Commonwealth to revoke the certificate as provided in this Act.

A foreign corporation holding a valid certificate of authority shall have no greater rights and privileges than a domestic corporation. The certificate of authority shall not be deemed to authorize it to exercise any of its corporate powers or purposes that a foreign corporation is forbidden by law to exercise in the Commonwealth.

This Act does not authorize the Commonwealth to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-266, 13.1-271; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; and substituted “Act” for “chapter” in subsection A.

§ 13.1-924.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

No certificate of authority shall be issued to a foreign corporation unless the corporate name of such foreign corporation satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-829

.

If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-829

, to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth, if its real name is unavailable, the foreign corporation may use a designated name that is available, and that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-829

, if it informs the Commission of the designated name.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-267, 13.1-268, 13.1-277; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, cc. 232, 571; 2003, c. 592; 2005, c. 379; 2007, c. 925; 2012, c. 63.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 592, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only, (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2004] with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership, and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 592, effective October 1, 2004, substituted “that” for “which” in two places in subdivision A 1; rewrote paragraph A 2 b, which formerly read: “A name, the exclusive right to which is, at the time, reserved or registered in the manner provided in §§

13.1-631

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-830

or §

13.1-831

”; in paragraph A 2 c, inserted “shares” following “whether issuing” and added “for use in this Commonwealth”; added paragraphs A 2 d to A 2
l
; and added subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 379, effective March 21, 2005, in subsection E, inserted “designation,” substituted “§

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-630

, subsection A of §

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, subdivision 1 of §

50-73.2

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

” for “this chapter, Chapter 7 (§

13.1-542

et seq.), 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.), 13 (§

13.1-1100

et seq.), and 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of this title, and Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of Title 50,” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B of this section, the name” in subdivision A 2; deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsection B; combined former subdivision C 1 into present subsection C by substituting “the” for “The”; deleted former subdivision C 2, which read: “[Repealed.]”; and in subsection D, inserted “corporate” preceding “name” and substituted “may not transact business in” for “shall not transact business or affairs in.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63 rewrote the section.

§ 13.1-925.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall continuously maintain in the Commonwealth:

A registered office, which may be the same as any of its places of business.

A registered agent, who shall be:

An individual who is a resident of Virginia and either an officer or director of the corporation or a member of the Virginia State Bar, and whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office; provided such a registered agent (i) shall not be its own registered agent and (ii) shall designate by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, one or more natural persons at the office of the registered agent upon whom any process, notice or demand may be served and shall continuously maintain at least one such person at that office. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

The sole duty of the registered agent is to forward to the corporation at its last known address any process, notice or demand that is served on the registered agent.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-272; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1985, c. 522; 1994, c. 348; 2000, c. 162; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2007, c. 925.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 162, in subdivision A 2 b, deleted “or” following “professional corporation,” inserted “or registered limited liability partnership,” and inserted “with the Virginia State Bar” thereafter.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and substituted “who shall be” for “which shall be” in the introductory language of subdivision A 2; in subdivision A 2 a, inserted “An individual who is,” inserted “and either an officer or director of the corporation or a member of the Virginia State Bar, and,” substituted “office” for “address” and deleted “and who is an officer or director of the corporation or a member of the Virginia State Bar” following “registered office”; in subdivision A 2 b, substituted “A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company” for “A professional corporation, professional limited liability company,” substituted “authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “registered with the Virginia State Bar under §

54.1-3902

” and added the language beginning “provided such a registered agent”; and in subsection B, inserted “process” and “or demand.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice in the introductory paragraph of subsection A and in the first sentence of subdivision A 2 b; inserted “which” preceding “may be” in subdivision A 1; substituted “Virginia” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivision A 2 a; and inserted “that is” preceding “served” in subsection B.

§ 13.1-926.
Change of registered office or registered agent of a foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth may change its registered office or registered agent, or both, upon filing with the Commission a statement of change on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the foreign corporation;

The address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the post office address, including street and number, if any, of the new registered office, and the name of the city or county in which it is to be located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the corporation will be in compliance with the requirements of §

13.1-925

.

A statement of change shall forthwith be filed with the Commission by a foreign corporation whenever its registered agent dies, resigns or ceases to satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-925

.

A foreign corporation’s registered agent may sign a statement as required above if (i) the business address of the registered agent changes to another post office address within the Commonwealth or (ii) the name of the registered agent has been legally changed. A foreign corporation’s new registered agent may sign and submit for filing a statement as required above if (a) the former registered agent is a business entity that has been merged into the new registered agent, (b) the instrument of merger is on record in the office of the clerk of the Commission, and (c) the new registered agent is an entity that is qualified to serve as a registered agent pursuant to §

13.1-925

. In either instance, the registered agent or surviving entity shall forthwith file a statement as required above, which shall recite that a copy of the statement shall be mailed to the principal office address of the foreign corporation on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-273; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 622; 2003, c. 597; 2007, c. 925; 2010, c. 434.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 597 rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “If a registered agent changes his business address to another place within this Commonwealth, he shall change the address of the registered office of any corporation of which he is registered agent by filing a statement as required above except that it need be signed only by the registered agent and shall recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed to the corporation.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A and in subsection C; in subdivision A 3, deleted the parenthesis markings and “to be” preceding “located”; substituted “the” for “its” preceding “current” in subdivision A 5; substituted “will” for “shall” following “corporation” in subdivision A 6; substituted “contain a statement” for “recite” near the end in subsection C; and made punctuation and related changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “agent, or both, upon” for “agent by” and inserted “on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission”; rewrote subdivision A 3; in subsection B, substituted “a statement of change” for “a new statement” and “with the Commission by a foreign corporation” for “by the corporation”; and rewrote subsection C.

§ 13.1-927.
Resignation of registered agent of foreign corporation.

A registered agent may resign as agent for the corporation by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation stating (i) the name of the foreign corporation, (ii) the name of the agent, and (iii) that the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the foreign corporation. The statement of resignation shall be accompanied by a certification that the registered agent will have a copy of the statement mailed to the principal office of the corporation by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. When the statement of resignation takes effect, the registered office is also discontinued.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of (i) 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed with the Commission or (ii) the date on which a statement of change to appoint a registered agent is filed, in accordance §

13.1-926

, with the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925; 2010, c. 434; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

For the effect that failing to file a statement of change, following a resignation under this section, can have on the corporation’s certificate of authority, see §

13.1-930

C.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “a” for “his” preceding “certification” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “the agency” for “his agency” and “the registered agent shall mail” for “he has mailed” and inserted “on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-928.
Service of process on foreign corporation.

The registered agent of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall be an agent of such corporation upon whom any process, notice, order or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served. The registered agent may by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, designate a natural person or persons in the office of the registered agent upon whom any such process, notice, order or demand may be served. Whenever any such person accepts service of process, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in the Commonwealth, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the clerk of the Commission shall be an agent of the corporation upon whom service may be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Nothing in this section shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, order or demand, required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-214 to 13-217, 13.1-274; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, cc. 571, 622; 1991, c. 672; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2007, c. 925.

Cross references.

As to service on foreign corporations generally, see §

8.01-301

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and inserted “natural” preceding “person or persons” in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection A and twice in subsection B; and in subsection A, in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “by instrument in writing” for “by a written instrument” and “office of the registered agent” for “registered agent’s office.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Process, § 27.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Jurisdiction to enforce subpoena. —

Where a subpoena was served on a foreign corporation’s registered agent in Virginia, the court had jurisdiction to adjudicate the motion to compel compliance with the subpoena. Hadeed Carpet Cleaning, Inc. v. John Doe # 1, 86 Va. Cir. 59, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 101 (Alexandria Nov. 19, 2012), aff'd, 62 Va. App. 678, 752 S.E.2d 554, 2014

Va. App. LEXIS 1

(2014).

§ 13.1-928.1.
Merger of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is incorporated, and such corporation is the surviving entity of the merger, it shall, within 30 days after such merger becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated; however, the filing shall not be required when a foreign corporation merges with a domestic corporation, the foreign corporation’s articles of incorporation are not amended by said merger, and the articles of merger filed on behalf of the domestic corporation pursuant to §

13.1-896

contain a statement that the merger is permitted under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which the foreign corporation is incorporated and that the foreign corporation has complied with that law in effecting the merger.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated, and such corporation is not the surviving entity of the merger or, whenever such a foreign corporation is a party to a consolidation so permitted, the surviving or resulting domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, partnership, or limited partnership shall, if not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth, within 30 days after such merger or consolidation becomes effective, deliver to the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger or consolidation duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it was incorporated and comply in behalf of the predecessor corporation with the provisions of §

13.1-929

. If a surviving or resulting corporation or limited liability company, business trust, partnership, or limited partnership is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth and has not received a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth, within such 30 days, deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth, together with a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger or consolidation and also, in case of a merger, a copy of its articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose laws it is incorporated.

Upon the merger or consolidation of two or more foreign corporations any one of which owns property in the Commonwealth, all such property shall pass to the surviving or resulting corporation except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state by which it is governed, but only from the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger or consolidation is filed with the Commission.

History.

1986, c. 571; 1990, c. 283; 2006, c. 663; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663 added the language beginning “however, the filing shall not be required when” in subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” twice, “entity of the merger” for “corporation” and “instrument” for “articles”; and rewrote subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 substituted “law it is incorporated” for “laws such merger was effected” in subsection A and substituted “law it was incorporated” for “laws such merger or consolidation was effected” in subsection B.

§ 13.1-928.2.
Entity conversion of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth converts to another type of entity, the surviving or resulting entity shall, within 30 days after such entity conversion becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of entity conversion duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws such entity conversion was effected; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth or is not a foreign limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, then, within 30 days after such entity conversion, it shall comply on behalf of the predecessor corporation with the provisions of §

13.1-929

; or

If the surviving or resulting entity is a foreign limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership and is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth, then, within such 30 days, it shall deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth or, in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership, a statement of registration.

Upon the entity conversion of a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, all property in the Commonwealth owned by the foreign corporation shall pass to the surviving or resulting entity except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction by which it is governed, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of entity conversion is filed with the Commission.

History.

2004, c. 274.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”